Hawaii, session 2026, SB1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 242, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, amended the name, composition, and duties of the state highway safety and modernization council to make the council an independently led group of expert stakeholders to review the department of transportation's efforts to ensure transparency and provide guidance to the department and legislature to help achieve state transportation goals and outcomes. However, removing the director of transportation as chair and from the council has inadvertently severed the council's administrative attachment to the department of transportation, leading to a loss of essential administrative support. Additionally, the council has historically faced challenges in achieving quorum due to the absence of explicit authorization for certain members to appoint designees, thereby limiting flexibility in attendance and impeding the council's ability to conduct official business. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Administratively attach the state highway safety and modernization council to the department of transportation; (2)  Clarify the law to allow members to appoint their designees to serve on the council; and (3)  Update membership to facilitate meeting of quorum and legislative intent. SECTION 2.  Section 286-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is established the Hawaii highway safety and modernization council[.] that shall be administratively attached to the department of transportation.  The council shall be chaired on an annually rotating basis by a member appointed by the president of the senate and a member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.  In addition to the member appointed by the president of the senate and member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, the following [or their designated representatives] shall be members of the council:  [the] (1)  The chief justice[, the] or their designee; (2)  The director of transportation[, the] or their designee; (3)  The attorney general[, the] or their designee; (4)  The director of health[, the superintendent of education, the executive director of the state public charter school commission, the president of the University of Hawaii, the] or their designee; (5)  The chairperson of the [University] university of Hawaii at Manoa department of urban and regional planning[, the co-chairpersons of] or their designee; (6)  The co-chairpersons of the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission[, the] or the co-chairpersons' designees; (7)  The director of the office of planning and sustainable development[, the chief energy officer of the Hawaii state energy office, an additional two] or their designee; (8)  Two additional members appointed by the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives, respectively[, the chairperson of each of the county highway safety councils established under section 286-6, and not]; (9)  One member from each county agency with jurisdiction over transportation or a designee appointed by each county mayor; and (10)  Not more than [twelve] ten other persons who shall be appointed by the governor for a three-year term as follows: [(1)] (A)  One member from an organization representing senior citizens; [(2)  One member from an organization representing bicyclists; (3)  One member from an organization having a focus on micro-mobility; (4)  One member from an organization having a focus on transportation, planning, and improvement; (5)] (B)  One member from an organization representing active transportation riders; (C)  One member from an organization [having a focus on reducing the cost of transportation for] representing low-income or other vulnerable communities; [(6)] (D) One member from an organization representing labor and construction; [(7)] (E) One member from an organization representing trucking and cargo carriers; [(8)] (F) One member from an organization having a focus on the electrification of transportation; [(9)] (G) One member from an organization having a focus on expanding trees and foliage and reducing urban heat; [(10)] (H)One member from an organization representing the automobile [manufacturing] industry; and [(11)] (I)Up to two members on the basis of their interest in transportation safety and related state goals." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________